Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 33
CUSTOM PROCESSING
OF MEAT ANIMALS

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 12 of chapter 7, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1989, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1989, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For brand inspections and slaughterers of livestock, see article 43 of this title 35.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION, AND LICENSING
OF PROCESSING FACILITIES

PART 3 ADVERTISING AND SALE

PART 4 PENALTIES